Maryland, session 2025, HB1337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
12–104.
(a) The damages to be awarded for the taking of land is its fair market value.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1337*

HOUSE BILL 1337
(H) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “BUSINESS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 12–201 OF THIS
TITLE.
(III) “FARM OPERATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 12–201
OF THIS TITLE.
(2) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER DAMAGES ALLOWED UNDER THIS
SECTION, THE OWNER OF A BUSINESS OR FARM OPERATION CONDUCTED ON THE
PROPERTY TAKEN IS ENTITLED TO COMPENSATION FOR LOSS OF PROFIT IF THE
OWNER PROVES:
(I) THE AMOUNT OF THE PROFIT LOSS; AND
(II) THAT THE LOSS OF PROFIT:
1. IS DIRECTLY AND PROXIMATELY CAUSED BY THE
TAKING OR DAMAGING OF THE PROPERTY;
2. CANNOT REASONABLY BE PREVENTED BY
RELOCATION OF THE BUSINESS OR FARM OPERATION OR BY TAKING STEPS AND
ADOPTING PROCEDURES THAT A REASONABLY PRUDENT PERSON WOULD TAKE AND
ADOPT IN PRESERVING ANY LOST PROFIT;
3. WILL NOT BE INCLUDED IN RELOCATION PAYMENTS
UNDER SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS TITLE; AND
4. WILL NOT BE DUPLICATED IN THE COMPENSATION
AWARDED TO THE OWNER.
(3) DAMAGES AWARDED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE
DETERMINED IN ACCORDANCE WITH GENERALLY ACCEPTED ACCOUNTING
PRINCIPLES APPLIED ON A CONSISTENT BASIS.
12–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated unless
otherwise apparent from context.
(c) “Business” means any lawful activity, except a farm operation, conducted
primarily:

HOUSE BILL 1337 3
(1) For the purchase, sale, lease, and rental of personal property and of real
property, and for the manufacture, processing, or marketing of products, commodities, or
any other personal property;
(2) For the sale of services to the public; or
(3) By a nonprofit organization.
(g) “Farm operation” means any activity conducted solely or primarily for the
production of one or more agricultural products or commodities, including timber for sale
or home use, and customarily producing these products or commodities in sufficient
quantity to be capable of contributing materially to the operator’s support.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.